Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-213
Experiment stations; expenditures; powers of Board of Regents.

To enable the Board of Regents to carry out the provisions of sections 85-201 to 85-215, it is hereby authorized to expend such amounts as it may deem necessary from any money hereafter appropriated for each station, to carry out the spirit and intent of said sections, either by the State of Nebraska or the United States, as the case might be.

Laws 1903, c. 114, § 6, p. 592;

Laws 1909, c. 143, § 6, p. 502;

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 6, p. 503;

R.S.1913, § 7144;

C.S.1922, § 6794;

Laws 1929, c. 15, § 5, p. 96;

C.S.1929, § 85-210;

R.S.1943, § 85-213.